Hawaii statutes.
[Part VI.] pregnant offenders;
restraints

[§353-121] Definitions. As used in this part:

"Labor" means the
period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient
frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive
dilation of the cervix.

"Postpartum recovery"
means:

(1) The entire period a female is in a hospital,
birthing center, or clinic after giving birth; and

(2) An additional time period, if any, a treating
physician determines is necessary for healing after the female leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic.

"Restraints" means
anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:

(1) Physical restraint; or

(2) A mechanical device, including metal handcuffs,
plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints,
tasers, or batons.

"Transport" means
the conveyance, by any means, of a committed person from the correctional
facility to another location, including travel to and from a transport vehicle.
[L 2011, c 174, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next